West Virginia, session 2025, HB2264.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of Revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 20, 2024, authorized under the authority of §60-2-11 of this code, modified by the Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on November 14, 2024, relating to the Alcohol Beverage Control Commissioner (distilleries, mini-distilleries, and micro-distilleries, 175 CSR 10), is authorized.